Maine, session 132, LD1150.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2157 is enacted to read:
§2157. Sheltering or aiding missing child
1. Duty to inform law enforcement officer. If a person knowingly shelters or aids
in obtaining shelter for a missing child for more than 24 hours without the consent of the
missing child's parent, guardian or legal custodian, the person shall inform a law
enforcement officer as to the missing child's location and condition if the law enforcement
officer contacts that person as part of the investigation of the missing child.
2. Violation. A person who violates subsection 1 is subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed $250.
Page 1 - 132LR1452(02)